Georgia statutes. 
Councilman as member of city-county recreation commission. - Even assuming that councilman's job with a city-county recreation commission could properly be considered a "municipal office" within the ambit of O.C.G.A. § 36-30-4, and further assuming that the councilman's simultaneous service as councilman would result in an impermissible conflict of interest, it is clear that the result would not be to disqualify the councilman from holding the office of city councilman but rather to render the councilman ineligible to continue the councilman's employment with the commission while serving as a councilman. Hughley v. City of Thomaston, 180 Ga. App. 207, 348 S.E.2d 570 (1986).

City police officers are municipal officers. - Fact that city police officer has been held to be an officer of the state, does not negate the fact that a police officer is also a municipal officer. Fowler v. Mitcham, 249 Ga. 400, 291 S.E.2d 515 (1982).

Fact that appellants may have been employees in their position as city police officers does not necessarily contra-indicate their status as office holders in that same position. Fowler v. Mitcham, 249 Ga. 400, 291 S.E.2d 515 (1982).

City police officer cannot be alderman. - O.C.G.A. § 36-30-4 prohibits one from simultaneously holding office of alderman and police officer of city. Fowler v. Mitcham, 249 Ga. 400, 291 S.E.2d 515 (1982).

Mayor of city is eligible to hold office of school commissioner. Akerman v. Ford, 116 Ga. 473, 42 S.E. 777 (1902).

Provision in city charter. - Under a city charter the mayor of a municipality could act not only as mayor, and receive the salary therefor, but could also be elected treasurer of the board of lights and waterworks, of which the mayor was ex officio a member, and receive the compensation fixed by the board for those services. There is no inhibition against one person holding both positions, and receiving both salaries, when authorized by the charter. Board of Lights & Waterworks v. Dobbs, 151 Ga. 53, 105 S.E. 611 (1921).

Commissioners of a city cannot select and appoint one of themselves as city manager, the office of commissioner and city manager being incompatible. Board of Comm'rs v. Montgomery, 170 Ga. 361, 153 S.E. 34 (1930).

Alderman ineligible to be board of education member. - An alderman comes under the inhibition of this section, and during such term as alderman is incompetent to hold office as a member of the board of education. Matthews v. Morris, 169 Ga. 723, 151 S.E. 391 (1930).

Membership on the board of education is a municipal office within the meaning of this section. Matthews v. Morris, 169 Ga. 723, 151 S.E. 391 (1930).

Membership on board of water commissioners prohibited. - Because the city council of Columbus serves a supervisory and/or appellate function in relation to the board of water commissioners, a conflict of interest would exist if a council member were to serve concurrently on the board. Columbus, Ga. v. Board of Water Comm'rs, 261 Ga. 219, 403 S.E.2d 791 (1991).

Cited in Walters v. City of Dublin, 262 Ga. 265, 417 S.E.2d 144 (1992).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Scope of section's prohibition. - Prohibition of O.C.G.A. § 36-30-4 applies to all elected city officials. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U82-27.

This section renders a councilman ineligible to hold another municipal office unless the councilman has resigned the seat on the council at some time prior to entering the second office; the councilman is not required to resign prior to qualifying to run for the second office. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-18.

Council member of a municipality may run for the office of mayor or other municipal office but must resign such council seat prior to taking the second office. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-18.

Date of termination of office. - Officer whose present position will be finally terminated prior to the beginning date of any new office the officer may gain by election, is eligible to seek and hold such second office. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 565.

Council member of a city is ineligible to hold the office of clerk of the city while still holding the office of councilman. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-36.

Trustee of school board. - Member of City Council of Chickamauga cannot lawfully serve as trustee of city school board. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U82-27.

Recorder of court. - Councilman is prohibited from serving as recorder of the mayor's court. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-61.

Building inspector. - City commissioner cannot simultaneously hold office of city building inspector. 1962 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 333.

County commissioner. - Member of State Agricultural Commodities Commission may simultaneously hold the office of county commissioner. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U76-30.

Volunteer firefighter. - Dual service as a volunteer firefighter and member of a city council or county commission does not violate the provisions of O.C.G.A. § 36-30-4 or O.C.G.A. § 45-2-2; however, cities and counties must determine for themselves, based on the circumstances, whether a common-law conflict of interest exists. 1998 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U98-8.

Position with political committee. - An officer, member, or employee of a political committee is not a "public officer." 1966 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-181.

Holding party office. - Since state officials are not prevented from holding city or county offices, and since the positions involved are not ones for which political activity is banned by the rules and regulations of the merit system, a member of the board of commissioners is eligible to hold office on the Democratic executive committee at either the county or state level. 1966 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-181.

City commissioner may not sit on city zoning board. - Member of a city commission may not so serve and at the same time serve on a city planning and zoning board. 1971 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U71-107.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 219. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 57, 62.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 273 et seq.

ALR. - Time as of which eligibility or ineligibility to office is to be determined, 143 A.L.R. 1026.

36-30-5. Inclusion of residency in annexed territory in computing period of residence necessary to qualify for office.

Statute text

Whenever the charter of any incorporated municipality provides for a prior period of residency in the municipality as a qualification for the election or appointment of any person to any office or position in the municipal government, residence in territory which is afterwards annexed to the municipality shall be deemed residence within the municipality for the purpose of computing the period of residence to make one eligible to hold such office or position.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 426, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 212.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 419, 423 et seq.

36-30-6. Voting upon questions by interested councilmembers.

Statute text

It is improper and illegal for a member of a municipal council to vote upon any question brought before the council in which he is personally interested.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 751; Civil Code 1910, § 900; Code 1933, § 69-204.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decision in Daly v. Georgia S. & F.R.R., 80 Ga. 793, 7 S.E. 146 (1888).

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963). For article surveying important general legal principles of municipal and county government purchasing and contracting in Georgia, see 16 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (1965). For article discussing the impropriety of municipal employees representing their own self-interests in public matters, specifically relating to municipal purchasing, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 309 (1969). For article discussing the effect of the general criminal statute on self-interest and municipal purchasing (§ 16-10-6) on the general statute on votes by municipal councilmen in matters of personal interest (this section) and on local statutory law, see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 431 (1971).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

"Personal" interest is construed as a "financial" interest. Story v. City of Macon, 205 Ga. 590, 54 S.E.2d 396 (1949).

Contract void when council member stockholder in benefited corporation. - Contract entered into between a private corporation and a city, under which the corporation is to perform certain work for which payment is to be made out of the city treasury, is void if at the time of the contract's execution one of the members of the city council was also a stockholder in such private corporation and such a contract does not become valid and legal when, subsequently, the interested member of the council sells the stock which the member owned at the time of the execution of the contract. Hardy v. Mayor of Gainesville, 121 Ga. 327, 48 S.E. 921 (1904).

Contract between a city and a construction company, in which a member of a council is a large stockholder, is null and void, although such member of a council did not vote for the ordinance authorizing such contract, and did not use the member's influence in procuring other members of council to approve and authorize the making of such contract, and although such contract is fair and free from fraud. Montgomery v. City of Atlanta, 162 Ga. 534, 134 S.E. 152 (1926).

Contract cannot be ratified by resignation of member. - When such an illegal contract has been made, the contract cannot subsequently be ratified by the resignation of the interested councilman and the confirmation of the contract by the council. Montgomery v. City of Atlanta, 162 Ga. 534, 134 S.E. 152 (1926).

Appointment of depository of which mayor and councilman are officers. - An ordinance naming a certain bank as the city depository and requiring the treasurer of the city to place all the municipal funds coming into the treasurer's hands therein is not necessarily void because the mayor of the city and one of the councilmen voting to adopt the ordinance were respectively officer and director of the bank named as depository. Smith v. City of Winder, 22 Ga. App. 278, 96 S.E. 14 (1918).

Ownership of land subject of public improvement. - Ownership by a member of a municipal council of land which will be affected by a public improvement does not disqualify the member from voting on such improvement. Story v. City of Macon, 205 Ga. 590, 54 S.E.2d 396 (1949).

Councilman employed as attorney by contractor. - Abutting owners cannot complain after completion of a municipal contract because of illegal participation in the execution of a municipal contract by a councilman who had been employed as an attorney by the contractor. Cochran v. City of Thomasville, 167 Ga. 579, 146 S.E. 462 (1928).

Employment by school subject of rezoning. - Fact that a councilman is employed by a school which would benefit from a rezoning which is being voted on is not a sufficient "personal interest" to fall under this section. Crawford v. Brewster, 225 Ga. 404, 169 S.E.2d 317 (1969), overruled on other grounds, 244 Ga. 765, 262 S.E.2d 53 (1975).

Cited in Olley Valley Estates, Inc. v. Fussell, 232 Ga. 779, 208 S.E.2d 801 (1974).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 130.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 298.

ALR. - Validity of municipal ordinance as affected by motive of members of council which adopted it, 32 A.L.R. 1517.

Member of governmental board voting on measure involving his personal interest, 133 A.L.R. 1257.

36-30-7. Authorization and procedure for surrender of corporate charter.

Statute text

A municipal corporation in this state is authorized to surrender its corporate charter when such municipal corporation has not functioned under the corporate charter for a period of ten years, by petitioning the superior court of the county in which the municipal corporation lies, such petition being made by a majority of the registered voters of the nonfunctioning municipal corporation. Thereupon, the judge of the superior court may receive the surrendered corporate charter and by order of the court declare the municipal corporation to be dissolved. Any order of any superior court judge dissolving any municipal corporation within this state will be furnished in duplicate to the Secretary of State and shall serve as notice upon the Secretary of State that the municipal corporation has, by order of the court, been dissolved as a municipal corporation.

History

(Ga. L. 1947, p. 1545, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963). For article, "Selected Oddities in Georgia Municipal Law," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1975). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions under former Ga. L. 1872, p. 18, are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Delegation of legislative power to courts. - Basic principle embodied in the separation of powers doctrine is that the legislature cannot delegate legislative power to the courts. This does not mean, however, that the legislature is forbidden from conferring power on the courts to ascertain whether the statutory requirements for dissolution of a municipal charter have been satisfied in particular cases. Harrell v. Courson, 234 Ga. 350, 216 S.E.2d 105 (1975).

No delegation of legislative authority to voters. - Under the terms of this section, there is no delegation of legislative authority to a majority of the voters of municipalities. Harrell v. Courson, 234 Ga. 350, 216 S.E.2d 105 (1975).

Cessation of official duties. - Fact that mayor, recorder, and alderman voluntarily ceased to perform their official duties did not operate to terminate corporate existence. Such officers held office until their successors were elected and qualified, though not functioning. Sell v. Turner, 138 Ga. 106, 74 S.E. 783 (1912) (decided under Ga. L. 1872, p. 18).

Cited in Paige v. Gray, 437 F. Supp. 137 (M.D. Ga. 1977); City of Mt. View v. Clayton County, 242 Ga. 163, 249 S.E.2d 541 (1978); Turner County v. City of Ashburn, 293 Ga. 739, 749 S.E.2d 685 (2013).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

This section provides exclusive method of dissolution. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 519.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 83.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 131, 137.

36-30-7.1. Inactive municipalities.

Statute text

(a) On and after July 1, 1995, any municipal corporation in this state shall be deemed an inactive municipality and its charter shall be repealed by operation of law if the municipal corporation fails to meet any of the minimum standards provided in subsection (b) of this Code section for determining an active municipality.

(b) An active municipality is any incorporated municipality in this state the governing body of which meets each of the following minimum standards:

(1) Provides at least three of the following services, either directly or by contract:

(A) Law enforcement;

(B) Fire protection (which may be furnished by a volunteer fire force) and fire safety;

(C) Road and street construction or maintenance;

(D) Solid waste management;

(E) Water supply or distribution or both;

(F) Waste-water treatment;

(G) Storm-water collection and disposal;

(H) Electric or gas utility services;

(I) Enforcement of building, housing, plumbing, and electrical codes and other similar codes;

(J) Planning and zoning; and

(K) Recreational facilities;

(2) Holds at least six regular, monthly or bimonthly, officially recorded public meetings within the 12 months next preceding the execution of the certificate required by subsection (c) of this Code section; and

(3) Qualifies for and holds a regular municipal election as provided by law, other than a municipality which has a governing authority comprised of commissioners or other members who are appointed by a judge of the superior court.

(c) Not later than July 1, 1994, each municipal corporation in this state shall file with the Department of Community Affairs either:

(1) A certification from the governing authority that the municipal corporation meets the minimum standards for determining an active municipality enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section; or

(2) A certification from the governing authority that the municipal corporation does not meet the minimum standards for determining an active municipality enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section, including a statement that the governing authority recognizes that its legal existence will under the provisions of this Code section be terminated as of July 1, 1995.

(d) After October 15, 1994, the Department of Community Affairs shall transmit to the governing authority of each municipal corporation in the state either:

(1) A statement confirming that the Department of Community Affairs has received from the municipal corporation the filing required by subsection (c) of this Code section, including a statement of which type of filing was received from that municipal corporation; or

(2) A statement that the Department of Community Affairs has not received from the municipal corporation the filing required by subsection (c) of this Code section, including a statement that the municipal corporation's legal existence will be terminated as of July 1, 1995, unless such filing is received by December 31, 1994.

(e) A municipal corporation which does not timely make the filing required by subsection (c) of this Code section shall have a grace period until December 31, 1994, to make such filing. However, if such filing is not made by December 31, 1994, the legal status of the municipal corporation shall be the same as that of a municipal corporation which does not meet the minimum standards for determining an active municipality enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section; and such municipal corporation shall cease to have legal existence as of July 1, 1995.

(f) As quickly as practicable after December 31, 1994, the Department of Community Affairs shall compile a listing of all municipal corporations in this state indicating those whose legal existence will be terminated as of July 1, 1995, and those whose legal existence will not be so terminated. A certified copy of such listing shall be provided to the Secretary of State and shall be conclusive evidence, acceptable in any court and recordable in any public records, of the termination or continuation of existence of a municipal corporation. The Secretary of State shall transmit such a certified copy of the listing to the legislative counsel for publication in the Georgia Laws for the year 1995, and all courts of this state may take judicial notice of the listing so published.

(g) Upon the termination of existence of a municipal corporation as provided for in this Code section, the existence of any local authority created by or for such municipal corporation shall likewise terminate on the same date. Upon the termination of any municipal corporation or local authority under this Code section, all assets, property, and legal rights and obligations of the municipal corporation or local authority shall devolve by operation of law upon the governing authority of the county in which the legal situs of the municipal corporation or local authority was located; provided, however, that this devolution of rights and obligations shall in no manner obligate the county to provide continued employment for any employee of the abolished municipal corporation or local authority. In the case of legal indebtedness of a municipal corporation or local authority devolving upon a county under this Code section, the county shall be authorized but not required to levy a special district tax, fee, or assessment within the formerly incorporated territory (or a portion thereof corresponding to any special district for which the indebtedness was incurred) for the purpose of retiring all or a portion of such indebtedness. Assets devolved to the county governing authority pursuant to this Code section which are deemed to be excess by the county shall be used to retire any indebtedness of the terminated municipal corporation or local authority. Property devolved to the county governing authority pursuant to this Code section which is deemed to be unnecessary by the county shall be sold and the proceeds from such sale used to retire any indebtedness of the terminated municipal corporation or local authority.

(h) (1) Upon the termination of existence of a municipal corporation as provided in this Code section, the geographic area that was contained in the boundaries of the former municipal corporation may continue to be identified under the same name and style as the former municipal corporation, and for such purpose signs and other appropriate insignia may be erected for such identification.

(2) The Department of Community Affairs shall establish a designation of "historic township" for communities created on or before 1900, provide for the establishment of unincorporated town councils, provide a procedure for converting such municipalities to townships, and for registration of such.

(i) At the session of the General Assembly held in the year 1996 only, a new charter may be granted to a municipal corporation which ceased to exist under the provisions of this Code section solely because of a failure to make the required filing with the Department of Community Affairs (not including any case where the municipal corporation failed to meet the minimum standards of an active municipality enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section), without regard to the minimum standards for incorporation set out in Chapter 31 of this title. In such a case the local law granting the new charter shall have attached thereto, in lieu of the certificate otherwise required by Code Section 36-31-5, a certificate by the author of the bill stating that the requirements of this subsection are met by the municipal corporation being reincorporated. In any such case assets and property and rights and obligations which devolved upon the county shall be retransferred from the county back to the municipal corporation.

(j) In any case in which the legal dissolution of a municipal corporation has not been certified under the provisions of subsection (f) of this Code section but the municipal corporation does not in fact meet the minimum standards for determining an active municipality enumerated in subsection (b) of this Code section, any citizen of the municipal corporation or the county in which the legal situs of the municipal corporation is located may bring at any time on or after July 1, 1995, a declaratory judgment action for a declaration of the dissolution of the municipal corporation. Any such action shall be brought in the superior court of the county wherein the legal situs of the municipal corporation is located. If a judgment is entered declaring the dissolution of the municipal corporation, the court shall file a certified copy of the judgment with the Secretary of State and the legislative counsel. A copy of such judgment shall be published in the next publication of the annual session laws with the same status and effect provided for in subsection (f) of this Code section; and a certified copy of the judgment from the court or the Secretary of State shall have the same status and effect as described in subsection (f) of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-30-7.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1579, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 36.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "Recreational facilities" was substituted for "Recreational Facilities" in subparagraph (b)(1)(K), the paragraph (1) and (2) designations were added in subsection (h), and a comma was inserted following "to townships" in paragraph (h)(2).

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

For note on 1993 enactment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 160 (1993).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Standing to bring action to dissolve city. - Subsection (j) of O.C.G.A. § 36-30-7.1, authorizing "any citizen" to bring an action for dissolution of a city, does not apply only to those municipalities which the Georgia Department of Community Affairs omitted from the list of inactive and active municipalities compiled pursuant to subsection (f) of O.C.G.A. § 36-30-7.1. City of Lithia Springs v. Turley, 241 Ga. App. 472, 526 S.E.2d 364 (1999).

Unified government meets the statutory criteria of an "active municipality." Athens-Clarke County v. Walton Elec. Membership Corp., 265 Ga. 229, 454 S.E.2d 510 (1995).

City meets requirements of an active municipality. - City's contract with county under which the county provided law enforcement, street construction and maintenance, solid waste collection, and recreational services in consideration of the county's receipt of sales taxes was valid and showed that the city met the requirements of an active municipality. Sherrer v. City of Pulaski, 228 Ga. App. 78, 491 S.E.2d 129 (1997).

Order dissolving a city was vacated since it was determined that the city provided road or street construction or maintenance services and water supply services and since there were issues of fact as to whether the city provided fire protection services, enforcement of the city's building code, or planning and zoning services. City of Lithia Springs v. Turley, 241 Ga. App. 472, 526 S.E.2d 364 (1999).

36-30-8. Confinement of violators of ordinances.

Statute text

The right and power to organize work gangs or other means of confinement and to confine at labor therein, for a term not exceeding 30 days, persons convicted of violating the ordinances of municipal corporations is conferred on the municipal corporations or their respective authorities. In addition to other punishment allowed by law, municipal corporations, by and through their municipal courts, shall have the right and power to punish persons convicted of violating the ordinances of such municipal corporations by confinement or confinement at labor for a period of time not to exceed 30 days.

History

(Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 179, § 1; Code 1933, § 69-205.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

One purpose of this section is the broadening of powers of municipalities by permitting the imposition of an alternative sentence, which had previously been held to be taboo because it was coercive in nature. City of Albany v. Key, 124 Ga. App. 16, 183 S.E.2d 20 (1971).

This section is permissive, and not mandatory. City of Albany v. Key, 124 Ga. App. 16, 183 S.E.2d 20 (1971).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 21A Am. Jur. 2d, Criminal Law, §§ 862, 863. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 361.

C.J.S. - 72 C.J.S., Prisons and Rights of Prisoners, §§ 1, 4.

36-30-9. Compensation of law enforcement officers.

Statute text

It shall be unlawful for any municipal corporation to provide commissions or percentages of any fines and bond forfeitures derived from any arrests made by law enforcement officers as compensation or any part thereof. The sole basis of compensating such employees shall be by a fixed salary, to be provided by the governing authority of such municipal corporation.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 479, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police, and Constables, §§ 41, 42, 45.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 634 et seq.

36-30-10. Grant of right to obstruct public street prohibited.

Statute text

Without express legislative authority, a municipal corporation may not grant to any person the right to erect or maintain a structure or obstruction in a public street.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 745; Civil Code 1910, § 894; Code 1933, § 69-304.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decision in Laing v. Mayor of Americus, 86 Ga. 756, 13 S.E. 107 (1891).

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Specific Obstructions

General Consideration

General application of this section has been to deny a city's right to permit obstructions that would constitute a nuisance and impede travel. City Council v. Shields, 108 Ga. App. 790, 134 S.E.2d 481 (1963).

Delegability of power to abolish, vacate or close street. - Legislature may delegate to a municipal corporation the power to abolish, vacate, or close a street in a municipality. When a street is abolished or closed by a municipality by virtue of such delegated power, the interest of the public therein ceases, and the owners of the fee, who are presumptively the abutting landowners, become entitled to use the property without regard to the former servitude imposed upon the land. Harbuck v. Richland Box Co., 207 Ga. 537, 63 S.E.2d 333 (1951).

Streets are primarily intended for the use of travelers; and a municipal corporation has no power, in the absence of express legislative authority, to allow a street to be used for any other purpose. City Council v. Reynolds, 122 Ga. 754, 50 S.E. 998 (1905).

Obstruction defined. - Any permanent structure in a road which materially interferes with travel is a nuisance per se, and any obstruction permanent in nature or continuously maintained which interferes with the free use of the road by the public is a public nuisance, and it is immaterial that space may be left on either side of the obstruction for the passage of the public. The public has the right to the unobstructed use of the whole road as the road was acquired by the county or city. Harbuck v. Richland Box Co., 204 Ga. 352, 49 S.E.2d 883 (1948).

Use of streets not absolute. - Use of streets and highways is not absolute and unrestricted, but is subject to reasonable regulation. Schlesinger v. City of Atlanta, 161 Ga. 148, 129 S.E. 861 (1925).

Limitations on right of public use. - Right of the public to the free and unobstructed use of a street or public way is subject to reasonable and necessary limitations. The right to temporarily obstruct the street springs from the necessities of the case, and such right is necessarily limited by the necessity existing. Those who exercise the right must do so in such manner as will create the least possible inconvenience to others, and the impediment must be removed within a reasonable time. Harbuck v. Richland Box Co., 204 Ga. 352, 49 S.E.2d 883 (1948).

Section not basis for municipal liability. - In the planning and the construction of a safety zone on a city street, the city was engaged in a governmental function and could not be held liable for any error in judgment in such planning. Beall v. City of Atlanta, 72 Ga. App. 760, 34 S.E.2d 918 (1945).

This section is not primarily a safety measure, and is not a basis for liability for injury caused indirectly by a condition in or adjacent to the traveled portion of the street. City Council v. Shields, 108 Ga. App. 790, 134 S.E.2d 481 (1963).

Cited in Neal & Son v. Burch, 173 Ga. 840, 162 S.E. 135 (1931); City of Moultrie v. Colquitt County Rural Elec. Co., 211 Ga. 842, 89 S.E.2d 657 (1955); Southern Bell Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Martin, 229 Ga. 881, 194 S.E.2d 910 (1972); Georgia Power Co. v. Zimmerman, 133 Ga. App. 786, 213 S.E.2d 12 (1975).

Specific Obstructions

Permanent structures. - Municipal corporation has no power, in the absence of express legislative authority, to authorize the erection of permanent structures in a public street, which interfere with the free use of such street by the public. Savannah & W.R.R. v. Woodruff, 86 Ga. 94, 13 S.E. 156 (1890); Laing v. Mayor of Americus, 86 Ga. 756, 13 S.E. 107 (1891); City Council v. Jackson, 20 Ga. App. 710, 93 S.E. 304 (1917); Mayor of Savannah v. Markowitz, 155 Ga. 870, 118 S.E. 558 (1923).

Permissibility of noninterfering structures. - Permanent structures which do not interfere with travel and which are erected for public purposes, such as telegraph and telephone poles, and the like, are permissible. But no permanent structure of any character which interferes in the slightest degree with the right of travel upon the street is ever permissible if such structure is erected for purely private purposes. City Council v. Reynolds, 122 Ga. 754, 50 S.E. 998 (1905).

Temporary obstructions. - Temporary obstructions in a street are permissible under certain circumstances, even if the obstruction is for the benefit or convenience of an individual. The general rule is that if the purpose for which the obstruction is created is lawful, and the obstruction exists only for such a time as is reasonably necessary to accomplish the purpose which brings about the necessity for the obstruction, such an obstruction would not be a public nuisance. City Council v. Reynolds, 122 Ga. 754, 50 S.E. 998 (1905).

Any temporary obstruction in a public street is presumptively a public nuisance, and it is incumbent upon the persons responsible for the presence of such obstruction to show that the destruction was placed in the street in furtherance of a lawful and legitimate purpose, and has not been continued any longer than was reasonably necessary for the accomplishment of this purpose. City Council v. Reynolds, 122 Ga. 754, 50 S.E. 998 (1905).

Expenses incurred in erecting obstruction no defense. - It is no reason for not removing the obstructions from a street that the plaintiff has incurred expense in erecting and maintaining the obstruction, and no lapse of time will render the license irrevocable. Laing v. Mayor of Americus, 86 Ga. 756, 13 S.E. 107 (1891); Mayor of Savannah v. Markowitz, 155 Ga. 870, 118 S.E. 558 (1923).

Obstructions "for purely private gain" are not permissible. - Streets are primarily intended for the use of travelers, and any permanent structure in a street which materially interferes with travel thereon is a public nuisance. Permanent structures which do not interfere with travel, and which are erected for public purposes, such as telegraph and telephone poles, and the like, are permissible. City Council v. Reynolds, 122 Ga. 754, 50 S.E. 998 (1905); Butler v. City of Atlanta, 47 Ga. App. 341, 170 S.E. 539 (1933).

Fair in public street a nuisance. City Council v. Reynolds, 122 Ga. 754, 50 S.E. 998 (1905).

Constitutionality of restriction of buses. - Use of streets by common carriers for the purpose of gain is extraordinary and may be conditioned or prohibited as the legislature or municipality deems proper. Hence, if the state or city determines that the use of streets by buses should be restricted or prohibited there is nothing in the Constitution of the United States or this state which prohibits such action. Schlesinger v. City of Atlanta, 161 Ga. 148, 129 S.E. 861 (1925).

Use by streetcars. - Legislature has expressly given to cities the power to permit the use of streets for the operation of streetcars, and has conferred upon the city commissioners the authority to determine the location of trolley poles by provisions of former Code 1933, § 94-301 (see now O.C.G.A. § 46-8-100(5)). Townsend v. Georgia Power Co., 44 Ga. App. 132, 160 S.E. 712 (1931).

Medians. - When a median does not interfere with the plaintiffs' ingress and egress to plaintiff's properties but requires mere circuity of travel only, abutting landowners have no cause of action as this section does not apply. Hadwin v. Mayor of Savannah, 221 Ga. 148, 143 S.E.2d 734 (1965).

Construction of "safety islands". - Municipality and street railroad companies operating within its limits have the power, without being guilty of maintaining a nuisance or committing thereby an act of negligence per se, to authorize the construction and maintenance of, and to construct and maintain under such municipal authority, what are termed "safety islands" or "safety zones" in streets at the side of a streetcar line, for the use and safety of the public from automobile and other traffic when entering and departing from streetcars. Butler v. City of Atlanta, 47 Ga. App. 341, 170 S.E. 539 (1933).

Municipal ordinance which was an attempt to vacate 20 feet of a public street for the benefit of a private corporation is in excess of statutory authority. Harbuck v. Richland Box Co., 204 Ga. 352, 49 S.E.2d 883 (1948).

Constructing bridges. - City may in the proper exercise of the city's discretion, and as a movement in the direction of public improvement, build a bridge in one of the city's streets, and, incidentally, close the street during the reasonable duration of the work. In like manner, the municipal authorities may authorize a railroad company to build the bridge for the benefit of the city, giving the company power to close the street for a reasonable time while the work is being done. Adair v. City of Atlanta, 124 Ga. 288, 52 S.E. 739 (1905).

City's right to obstruct street. - When it is not prohibited by law, a city may legally erect and maintain an obstruction in one of the city's streets, provided the obstruction is not dangerous, and does not constitute an unreasonable interference with the lawful use of the street. South Ga. Power Co. v. Smith, 42 Ga. App. 100, 155 S.E. 80 (1930).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1884, 1885.

ALR. - Power of municipality to permit permanent loading platforms in street, 11 A.L.R. 442.

Power to close or obstruct street temporarily to permit its use for purposes of sport or entertainment, 34 A.L.R. 270.

Validity, construction, and application of ordinances prohibiting or regulating "curb service", 111 A.L.R. 131.

Municipality's power to permit private owner to construct building or structure overhanging or crossing the air space above public street or sidewalk, 76 A.L.R.2d 896.

Authorization, prohibition, or regulation by municipality of the sale of merchandise on streets or highways, or their use for such purpose, 14 A.L.R.3d 896.

36-30-11. Enclosure of lanes or alleys.

Statute text

The municipal authorities of any municipal corporation are authorized to permit the enclosure of any lane, alley, or portion thereof in such municipal corporation when the owners of the lots abutting on such lane or alley and the owners of any other lots to the enjoyment of which access through such lane or alley is necessary consent thereto. Such municipal authorities shall have the right at any time to reopen such lane or alley.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 174, § 1; Code 1933, § 69-207.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

RESEARCH REFERENCES
